Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Military Service and Veterans

36-5-1.
Separation pay of unclassified employees entering service.

Every employee holding a position in the unclassified service of the state, on or after August 8, 1940, who has left or shall leave that position by reason of entering the armed forces of the United States (whether through membership in the reserve of the United States military, air, or naval forces or in the Rhode Island national guard or naval reserve, or by reason of enlistment, induction, commission, or otherwise) and who has held a position in the state service for one hundred eighty (180) or more calendar days within the twelve (12) months next preceding that entrance into the armed forces, is entitled to and is hereby granted sixty (60) calendar days separation pay commencing with the time of leaving that position for that purpose. Every such employee shall be paid by the state the same amount as he would have received had he or she not been absent from his or her position in the unclassified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1320, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-1

.

36-5-2.
Rights of employees entering service after both classified and unclassified service.

Every employee holding a position in the classified service of the state, on or after August 8, 1940, who has left or shall leave that position by reason of entering the armed forces of the United States (whether through membership in the reserve of the United States military, air, or naval forces or in the Rhode Island national guard or naval reserve, or by reason of enlistment, induction, commission, or otherwise) and who has held a position in the classified service for less than one hundred eighty (180) days, but who has also held a position in the unclassified service, so that the cumulative service, both classified and unclassified, aggregates one hundred eighty (180) or more calendar days within the twelve (12) months next preceding entrance into the armed forces, is entitled to and is hereby granted the same rights of leave, payment of salary, accrual of sick leave and annual leave, and of return to his or her position under the same conditions as an employee whose entire one hundred eighty (180) days or more are or were in the classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1320, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-2

.

36-5-2.1.
Rights of employees entering service to maintain health care benefits.

Every employee holding a position in the classified or unclassified service, who has left or shall leave the position by reason of entering the armed forces of the United States (whether through membership in the reserve of the United States Military or Naval Forces or in the Rhode Island National Guard or Naval Reserves, when any of the foregoing units are called to active federal or state duty, or by reason of enlistment, induction commission or otherwise), and who has held a position in the classified or unclassified service for one hundred eighty (180) or more calendar days within the twelve (12) months next preceding entrance into the armed services, and who at the time of entrance into the armed services had family medical benefits, shall continue to be eligible to receive family medical benefits, in the same manner as available prior to entering service, for designated family members, excluding the employee, during the duration of his or her absences required by the continuance of service in the armed services and his or her return to classified or unclassified service. Nothing in this section, however, shall require the employee to continue family medical benefits provided by the state of Rhode Island or prevent the employee from enrolling in or receiving medical benefits from another source of health insurance coverage including the federal medical benefits program for deployed members of the armed services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 395, § 1.

36-5-3.
Retirement or pension credit for period in military service.

Whenever any employee of the state, or of any city, town, or political subdivision thereof, has been, is now, or shall be on a leave of absence from that employment because of service in the armed forces of the United States of America during any war in which the United States has been, is now, or shall be engaged, the leave of absence shall be construed as continuous employment for retirement pension and prescribed rights or benefits in any established retirement system or pension fund by whatever name called, as though the employee had not been on a leave of absence. The employee shall be entitled to all the rights, protections and privileges offered under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994 (USERRA), Title 38 U.S. Code, §§ 4301 — 4333 (38 U.S.C. 4301 — 4333) as those sections apply to retirement or pension benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1383, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2018, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-3

; P.L. 1972, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 304, § 1.

36-5-4.
Retirement credit provision supplementary.

Section

36-5-3

shall be deemed to prevail as being in addition to chapters 8 to 10, of this title and any other existing retirement law for any city, town or political subdivision thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1383, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-4

.

36-5-5.
Examinations for veterans’ employment representatives.

Whenever examinations are held in the state civil service for the classified position of veterans’ employment representative, these examinations shall be open only to honorably discharged veterans of all wars.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2000, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-5

.

36-5-6.
Veterans’ point credits.

While the examinations shall be limited to honorably discharged veterans of all wars, regulations of the director of administration, as applied to disabled veterans, shall be applicable to this position, that is, disabled veterans will receive ten (10) point credits and nondisabled veterans five (5) point credits.

“Veteran” is defined herein as any man or woman who has been engaged heretofore, is now, or may hereafter be engaged in the active service of the armed forces of the United States with a minimum of ninety (90) days of active duty time served during any declared war, undeclared war, Korean campaign, conflict in Vietnam or any war, campaign or conflict which the armed forces of the United States of America actively engages in and for which service a campaign ribbon or expeditionary medal was earned.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2000, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-5-6

; P.L. 1995, ch. 305, § 2.

36-5-7.
State employees — Veterans.

Any person who is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States and who has completed fifteen (15) or more years, not necessarily consecutive of service credit, those credits having been earned in either the classified, nonclassified, or unclassified service of the state or a combination of both, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in the position he or she holds at the time of obtaining fifteen (15) years of service credit. For any other position he or she may hold subsequent to the obtaining fifteen (15) years of service credit, the person, subject to a then existing list, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in the subsequent position and shall be protected by the provisions of this chapter; providing, however:

That military service not to exceed four (4) years of active service shall constitute service credit within the meaning of this section;

That in case of layoff or the abolition of a position through reorganization or otherwise, any person in that position or subject to layoff, who has full status, otherwise qualified under this section, shall be retained within the state services in a position of similar grade;

That this section shall not apply to employees of the state government whose method of appointment, salary, and term of office is specified by statute;

That all employees otherwise qualified under this section shall be subject to all of the provisions of dismissal and appeal as elsewhere described in this chapter.

This section shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is after August 7, 1996.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 375, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 3.

36-5-8.
State employment tenure for disabled veterans.

Any person who is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States of America and is also receiving a disability pension from the United States government for a service connected disability and has completed ten (10) years or more not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, those credits having been earned in either the classified, nonclassified or unclassified service of the state or a combination of both, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in the position he or she holds at the time of obtaining ten (10) years of service credit. For any other position he or she may hold subsequent to the obtaining ten (10) years of service credit, the person, subject to a then existing list, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in the subsequent position and shall be protected by the provisions of this chapter; provided, however:

That military service not to exceed four (4) years of active service shall constitute service credit within the meaning of this section;

That in case of layoff or the abolition of a position through reorganization or otherwise, any person in that position or subject to layoff, who has full status, otherwise qualified under this section, shall be retained within the state services in a position of similar grade;

That this section shall not apply to employees of the state government whose method of appointment, salary, and term of office is specified by statute;

That all employees otherwise qualified under this section shall be subject to all of the provisions of dismissal and appeal as elsewhere described in this chapter.

“Veteran” is defined herein as any man or woman who has been engaged heretofore, is now or may hereafter be engaged in the active service of the armed forces of the United States with a minimum of ninety (90) days of active duty time served during any declared war, undeclared war, Korean campaign, conflict in Vietnam or any war, campaign, or conflict which the armed forces of the United States of America actively engages in.

This section shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is after August 7, 1996.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 375, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 3.